Georgia, session 2025_26, SB62.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Defend the Guard Act."
SECTION 2.
Part 1 of Article 1 of Chapter 2 of Title 38 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to general provisions regarding state militia generally, is amended by revising Code
Section 38-2-5, relating to federal call up of militia, Governor's duties, utilization of
unorganized militia, and effect of unit's absence, as follows:
S. B. 62
- 1 -

LC 46 9000
"38-2-5.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Active duty combat' means performing the following services while in active federal
military service of the United States:
(A) Participating in an armed conflict;
(B) Carrying out a hazardous service in a foreign state; or
(C) Executing a duty through an instrumentality of war.
(2) 'Official declaration of war' means an official declaration of war made by the United
States Congress pursuant to Article I, Section 8, Clause 11 of the United States
Constitution.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, the Georgia National Guard and any
member thereof shall not be released from the state into active duty combat or combat
support operations unless the United States Congress has passed an official declaration of
war or has taken an official action pursuant to Article I, Section 8, Clause 15 of the United
States Constitution to explicitly call forth the Georgia National Guard and any member
thereof for the enumerated purposes to expressly execute the laws of the union, suppress
insurrections, or repel an invasion. The Governor shall take all actions necessary to
comply with the requirements of this Code section. Nothing in this subsection shall limit
or prohibit the Governor from consenting to the deployment of any Georgia National Guard
member for defense support of civil authority missions within the United States and United
States territories pursuant to 32 U.S.C. Section 328.
(c) When the militia of the state is called into federal service under the Constitution and
laws of the United States, the Governor shall order out for service the organized militia or
such part thereof as may be necessary; and, if the number available is insufficient, the
Governor may call for and accept from the unorganized militia as many volunteers as are
required for service in the organized militia. During the absence of the organized militia
S. B. 62
- 2 -

LC 46 9000
in the service of the United States, their state designations shall not be given to new
organizations."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 62
- 3 -